Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 5-102, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-102. A. No person may remove any propagated or
released wildlife or domesticated animals hunted for sport which are
killed at a commercial hunting area, including exotic wildlife,
without attaching a tag to each of such killed wildlife or
domesticated animals hunted for sport.
B. The tags shall be supplied by the Oklahoma Wildlife
Conservation Commission at a cost of no more than Ten Dollars
($10.00); provided, that there shall be no fee for tags for females
of the Cervidae family, feral swine, and exotic wildlife not native
to North America, which are hunted for sport and killed at a
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3145 Page 1

comm ercial hunting area. The tags shall contain such information as
the Commission may require and shall be numbered consecutively.
C. Such tag must remain attached to the individual wildlife or
domesticated animals hunted for sport until prepared and consumed
and shall not be used more than once.
D. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred
Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or
by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed sixty (60) days, or
by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate





ENGR. H. B. NO. 3145 Page 2